Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Records.

§ 63.2-1514.
Retention of records in all reports; procedures regarding unfounded reports alleged to be made in bad faith or with malicious intent.

The local department shall retain the records of all reports or complaints made pursuant to this chapter, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. However, all records related to founded cases of child sexual abuse involving injuries or conditions, real or threatened, that result in or were likely to have resulted in serious harm to a child shall be maintained by the local department for a period of 25 years from the date of the complaint.

The Department shall maintain a child abuse and neglect information system that includes a central registry of founded complaints, pursuant to §

63.2-1515

. The Department shall maintain all (i) unfounded investigations, (ii) family assessments, and (iii) reports or complaints determined to be not valid in a record which is separate from the central registry and accessible only to the Department and to local departments for child-protective services. The purpose of retaining these complaints or reports is to provide local departments with information regarding prior complaints or reports. In no event shall the mere existence of a prior complaint or report be used to determine that a subsequent complaint or report is founded. The subject of the complaint or report is the person who is alleged to have committed abuse or neglect. The subject of the complaint or report shall have access to his own record. The record of unfounded investigations that involved reports of child abuse or neglect shall be purged three years after the date of the complaint or report if there are no subsequent complaints or reports regarding the same child or the person who is the subject of the complaint or report within such three-year period. Records of complaints and reports determined to be not valid shall be purged one year after the date of the complaint or report if there are no subsequent complaints or reports regarding the same child or the person who is the subject of the complaint or report in that one year. The local department shall retain such records for an additional period of up to two years if requested in writing by the person who is the subject of such complaint or report. The record of family assessments shall be purged three years after the date of the complaint or report if there are no subsequent complaints or reports regarding the same child or the person who is the subject of the report in that three-year period. The child-protective services records regarding the petitioner which result from such complaint or report shall be purged immediately by any custodian of such records upon presentation to the custodian of a certified copy of a court order that there has been a civil action that determined that the complaint or report was made in bad faith or with malicious intent. After purging the records, the custodian shall notify the petitioner in writing that the records have been purged.

At the time the local department notifies a person who is the subject of a complaint or report made pursuant to this chapter that such complaint or report is either an unfounded investigation or a completed family assessment, it shall notify him how long the record will be retained and of the availability of the procedures set out in this section regarding reports or complaints alleged to be made in bad faith or with malicious intent. Upon request, the local department shall advise the person who was the subject of an unfounded investigation if the complaint or report was made anonymously. However, the identity of a complainant or reporter shall not be disclosed.

Any person who is the subject of an unfounded report or complaint made pursuant to this chapter who believes that such report or complaint was made in bad faith or with malicious intent may petition the circuit court in the jurisdiction in which the report or complaint was made for the release to such person of the records of the investigation or family assessment. Such petition shall specifically set forth the reasons such person believes that such report or complaint was made in bad faith or with malicious intent. Upon the filing of such petition, the circuit court shall request and the local department shall provide to the circuit court its records of the investigation or family assessment for the circuit court’s in camera review. The petitioner shall be entitled to present evidence to support his petition. If the circuit court determines that there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the report or complaint was made in bad faith or with malicious intent and that disclosure of the identity of the complainant would not be likely to endanger the life or safety of the complainant, it shall provide to the petitioner a copy of the records of the investigation or family assessment. The original records shall be subject to discovery in any subsequent civil action regarding the making of a complaint or report in bad faith or with malicious intent.

History.

1988, c. 686, § 63.1-248.5:1; 1996, cc. 780, 791; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 634; 2005, c. 77; 2010, c. 334; 2020, c. 38.

Cross references.

For disposition of court-ordered studies and reports, see Rule 8:5, Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Rules.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 634, in subsection B, deleted “family assessments” following “investigations” in the seventh sentence, substituted “such” for “the” following “retain” in the eighth sentence, inserted the ninth sentence, and substituted “that” for “which” in the next-to-last sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “how long” for “that” following “notify him,” and deleted “for one year” following “retained.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 77, added the last two sentences of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 334 inserted the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 38 substituted “that involved reports of child abuse or neglect shall be purged three years after the date of the complaint or report if there are no subsequent complaints or reports regarding the same child or the person who is the subject of the complaint or report within such three-year period. Records of complaints and reports determined to be not valid shall be purged” for “and complaints and reports determined to be not valid” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 63.2-1515.
Central registry; disclosure of information.

The central registry shall contain such information as shall be prescribed by Board regulation; however, when the founded case of abuse or neglect does not name the parents or guardians of the child as the abuser or neglector, and the abuse or neglect occurred in a licensed or unlicensed child day center as defined in § 22.1-289.02; a licensed, registered, or approved family day home as defined in § 22.1-289.02; a private or public school; or a children’s residential facility, the child’s name shall not be entered on the registry without consultation with and permission of the parents or guardians. If a child’s name currently appears on the registry without consultation with and permission of the parents or guardians for a founded case of abuse and neglect that does not name the parents or guardians of the child as the abuser or neglector, such parents or guardians may have the child’s name removed by written request to the Department. The information contained in the central registry shall not be open to inspection by the public. However, appropriate disclosure may be made in accordance with Board regulations.

The Department shall respond to requests for a search of the central registry made by (i) local departments, (ii) local school boards, and (iii) governing boards or administrators of private schools accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19 regarding applicants for employment, pursuant to § 22.1-296.4, in cases where there is no match within the central registry within 10 business days of receipt of such requests. In cases where there is a match within the central registry regarding applicants for employment, the Department shall respond to requests made by local departments, local school boards, and governing boards or administrators within 30 business days of receipt of such requests. The request and response may be sent electronically or by first-class mail or facsimile transmission.

The Department shall disclose information in the central registry to the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary for the purpose of determining if any person being considered for election to any judgeship has been the subject of any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect.

Any central registry check of a person who has applied to be a volunteer with a (a) Virginia affiliate of Big Brothers/Big Sisters of America, (b) Virginia affiliate of Compeer, (c) Virginia affiliate of Childhelp USA, (d) volunteer fire company or volunteer emergency medical services agency, or (e) court-appointed special advocate program pursuant to §

9.1-153

shall be conducted at no charge.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.8; 1993, cc. 48, 348, 955; 1994, cc. 700, 830; 2000, cc. 95, 734, 805; 2001, c. 321; 2002, cc. 371, 747; 2004, c. 74; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2016, c. 454; 2018, c. 578; 2020, cc. 300, 860, 861.

Cross references.

As to family assessments by local departments designated as child protective services differential response system participants, see §

63.2-1506

. As to Screened Family Day Home Provider List, see § 63.2-1704.1.

As to background checks for compensated employment of persons in assisted living facilities, adult day care centers, and child welfare agencies, see §

63.2-1720

; for licensure or registration as a child welfare agency and for certain foster or adoptive parents, see §

63.2-1721

.

As to records check for employees or volunteers of a child day center that is exempt from licensure pursuant to §

63.2-1716

, see §

63.2-1724

.

As to records check for employees or volunteers of a child day center or family day home, see § 63.2-1725.

As to adoption by the Board of Social Services of regulations requiring that each assisted living facility train all employees who are mandated to report adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation pursuant to §

63.2-1606

on such reporting procedures and the consequences for failing to make a required report, see §

63.2-1805

.

As to the Court-Appointed Special Advocate Program and volunteer court-appointed special advocates, see §

9.1-153

. As to background checks as condition of employment, see §§

37.2-314

,

37.2-408.1

,

37.2-416

,

37.2-506

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 371 amended § 63.1-248.8, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 371 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 371, in the third paragraph, inserted the clause designators (a), (c) and (d), and inserted clause (b).

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the Chairmen of the Committees for the Courts of Justice of the Senate and House of Delegates.” March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 74, in the second paragraph, substituted “10” for “ten” in the first sentence and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the second sentence; and in the last paragraph, inserted clause (c) and redesignated former clauses (c) and (d) as present clauses (d) and (e).

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “emergency medical services agency, or (e)” for “rescue squad, or (e) with a” in the third paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 454 inserted clause (iii), inserted “and governing boards or administrators” and made related changes in the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 added the third paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 300 substituted “The request and response may be sent electronically or” for “The response may be” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “as defined in § 22.1-289.02” twice in the first sentence and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).